Tennessee, session 114, HB0748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-18-304(a), is amended by
deleting "one dollar ($1.00)" and substituting "two dollars ($2.00)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0748
002504
- 1 -